Utah statutes.
17-43-308.   Specified treatments prohibited -- Criminal penalties.
(1)  It is a misdemeanor to give shock treatment, lobotomy, or surgery to
anyone without the written consent of the person's next of kin or legal
guardian. Services provided under this part are governed by Title 58, Chapter
67, Utah Medical Practice Act.
(2)  It is a felony to give psychiatric treatment, nonvocational mental health
counseling, case-finding testing, psychoanalysis, drugs, shock treatment,
lobotomy, or surgery to any individual for the purpose of changing his concept
of, belief about, or faith in God.
